Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.469

State financial education learning standards.

Standards in K-12 personal finance education developed by a national coalition for personal financial literacy that includes partners from business, finance, government, academia, education, and state affiliates are adopted as the state financial education learning standards.

[ 2015 c 211 s 5.]